ro-RO: Materialul ferestrei de carcasei: Acrilic; Vinil transparent (PVC); Plasă; Fără ferestre; Policarbonat (PC); TPU (poliuretan termoplastic); Altele
sl-SI: Material okna na ohišju: Akril; Prozorni vinil (PVC); Mrežasti zaslon; Brez oken; Polikarbonat (PC); TPU (termoplastični poliuretan); Drugo
zh-CN: 围护窗材料: 亚克力; 透明乙烯基（PVC）; 网纱; 无窗; 聚碳酸酯（PC）; TPU（热塑性聚氨酯）; 其他
en: Enclosure window material: Acrylic; Clear vinyl (PVC); Mesh screen; No windows; Polycarbonate (PC); TPU (thermoplastic polyurethane); Other
pt-BR: Material da janela da capa de fechamento: Acrílico; Vinil transparente (PVC); Tela de malha; Sem janelas; Policarbonato (PC); TPU (poliuretano termoplástico); Outro
th: วัสดุสำหรับหน้าต่างของโครงผ้าใบ: อะคริลิก; ไวนิลใส (PVC); ตาข่าย; ไม่มีหน้าต่าง; โพลิคาร์บอเนต (PC); TPU (โพลิยูรีเทนเทอร์โมพลาสติก); อื่นๆ
tr: Muhafaza pencere malzemesi: Akrilik; Şeffaf vinil (PVC); Tel örgü; Penceresiz; Polikarbonat (PC); TPU (termoplastik poliüretan); Diğer
cs: Materiál průhledných oken krytu: Akrylát; Průhledný vinyl (PVC); Síťovina; Bez oken; Polykarbonát (PC); TPU (termoplastický polyuretan); Jiné
pt-PT: Material da janela do recinto: Acrílico; Vinil transparente (PVC); Rede mosquiteira; Sem janelas; Policarbonato (PC); TPU (poliuretano termoplástico); Outro
nb: Materiale for innkapslingsvindu: Akryl; Gjennomsiktig vinyl (PVC); Netting; Ingen vinduer; Polykarbonat (PC); TPU (termoplastisk polyuretan); Annet
hu: A burkolat ablakának anyaga: Akril; Átlátszó vinil (PVC); Háló; Ablakok nélkül; Polikarbonát (PC); TPU (hőre lágyuló poliuretán); Egyéb
fr: Matériau des fenêtres de l’enceinte: Acrylique; Vinyle transparent (PVC); Écran en maille; Sans fenêtres; Polycarbonate (PC); TPU (polyuréthane thermoplastique); Autre
it: Materiale delle finestre dell'involucro: Acrilico; Vinile trasparente (PVC); Rete; Nessuna finestra; Policarbonato (PC); TPU (poliuretano termoplastico); Altro
el: Υλικό παραθύρου περιβλήματος: Ακρυλικό; Διάφανο βινύλιο (PVC); Σίτα; Χωρίς παράθυρα; Πολυανθρακικό (PC); TPU (θερμοπλαστική πολυουρεθάνη); Άλλο
fi: Sivuseinien ikkunamateriaali: Akryyli; Läpinäkyvä vinyyli (PVC); Verkko; Ei ikkunoita; Polykarbonaatti (PC); TPU (termoplastinen polyuretaani); Muu
vi: Vật liệu cửa sổ thùng xe: Acrylic; Nhựa vinyl trong suốt (PVC); Tấm lưới; Không có cửa sổ; Polycarbonate (PC); TPU (polyurethane nhiệt dẻo); Khác
ja: エンクロージャー窓材: アクリル; 透明ビニール (PVC); メッシュスクリーン; 窓なし; ポリカーボネート (PC); TPU (熱可塑性ポリウレタン); その他
pl: Materiał okna obudowy: Akryl; Przezroczysty winyl (PVC); Siatka; Bez okien; Poliwęglan (PC); TPU (poliuretan termoplastyczny); Inne
es: Material para ventanas de cerramiento: Acrílico; Vinilo transparente (PVC); Malla; Sin ventanas; Policarbonato (PC); TPU (poliuretano termoplástico); Otro
lt-LT: Gaubto lango medžiaga: Akrilo; Skaidrus vinilas (PVC); Tinklinis ekranas; Be langų; Polikarbonatas (PC); TPU (termoplastinis poliuretanas); Kita
nl: Venstermateriaal van overkapping: Acryl; Transparant vinyl (PVC); Gaasscherm; Geen ramen; Polycarbonaat (PC); TPU (thermoplastisch polyurethaan); Overig
da: Materiale til kabinevindue: Akryl; Gennemsigtig vinyl (PVC); Net; Ingen vinduer; Polykarbonat (PC); TPU (termoplastisk polyurethan); Andet
ko: 외장 창 패널 재질: 아크릴; 투명 비닐(PVC); 메시 스크린; 창문 없음; 폴리카보네이트(PC); TPU(열가소성 폴리우레탄); 기타
ru: Материал окон ограждения: Акрил; Прозрачный винил (PVC); Сетчатый экран; Без окон; Polycarbonate (PC); TPU (thermoplastic polyurethane); Другое
de: Material des Gehäusefensters: Acryl; Klares Vinyl (PVC); Netzgewebe; Ohne Fenster; Polycarbonat (PC); TPU (thermoplastisches Polyurethan); Sonstige
sk-SK: Materiál okienka krytu: Akryl; Priehľadný vinyl (PVC); Sieťovina; Bez okien; Polykarbonát (PC); TPU (termoplastický polyuretán); Iné
hr-HR: Materijal za prozore kućišta: Akril; Prozirni vinil (PVC); Mrežasti zaslon; Bez prozora; Polikarbonat (PC); TPU (termoplastični poliuretan); Ostalo
bg-BG: Материал на прозорците на заграждението: Акрил; Прозрачен винил (PVC); Мрежест екран; Без прозорци; Поликарбонат (PC); TPU (термопластичен полиуретан); Други
sv: Material för fönster på kapsling/inhägnad: Akryl; Genomskinlig vinyl (PVC); Nät; Inga fönster; Polykarbonat (PC); TPU (termoplastisk polyuretan); Annat
zh-TW: 圍罩窗材質: 壓克力; 透明乙烯基 (PVC); 網眼布; 無車窗; 聚碳酸酯 (PC); TPU (熱塑性聚氨酯); 其他